Louisiana, session 2026, HB1058.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5067.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5067.1. Data administration system
The administering agency shall establish and maintain a data administration
system for the collection of uniform data on all state financial aid programs to
conduct and report on statewide financial aid trends, effectiveness, outcomes
assessment, and other factors. The administering agency shall determine the uniform
data set necessary for such reports. Any postsecondary education institution that
admits students who are recipients of Taylor Opportunity Program for Students
awards shall submit to the administering agency the uniform data set as established
pursuant to this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.